Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2088
Receiver; powers.

A receiver appointed under section 71-2086 may exercise those powers and shall perform those duties set out by the court. A receiver may:

(1) Assume the role of administrator and take control of day-to-day operations or name an administrator to conduct the day-to-day operations of the health care facility subject to the supervision and direction of the receiver;

(2) Remedy violations of federal and state laws and regulations governing the operation of the health care facility;

(3) Let contracts and hire agents and employees, including legal counsel, to carry out the powers and duties of the receiver; and

(4) Hire or discharge any employees including the administrator.

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 64.